Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 19. Agricultural Cooperative Marketing Associations
5A Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Cooperative Associations §§ 71:261 et seq.

§79-19-45.
Association heretofore organized may adopt the provisions of this chapter.

Any corporation or association organized under previously existing statutes, or any foreign corporation or association heretofore authorized by the laws of this state to do business in this state, or any foreign corporation or association organized under the laws of another state, may by a majority vote of its directors or members be brought under this chapter. It shall make out in duplicate a statement signed and sworn to by a majority of its directors, to the effect that the corporation or association has by a majority vote of its directors decided to accept the benefits and be bound by the provisions of this chapter. Articles of association shall be filed as required herein except that they shall be signed by a majority of the members of the board of directors. The filing fee shall be the same as for filing an amendment to articles of association.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4121; 1942, § 4516; Laws, 1922, ch. 179.

§79-19-47.
How associations organized in another state may carry on business in this state.

Any cooperative marketing association, organized under appropriate laws of any other state for the purposes and with the restrictions and limitations substantially the same as those set forth herein, may operate and do business in this state with all the rights, powers, and privileges granted to any cooperative marketing association incorporated under this chapter, upon compliance with any or either of the laws of this state regarding the qualification of foreign corporations, to carry on business within this state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4122; 1942, § 4517; Laws, 1922, ch. 179.

4 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 483, Doing Business.

§79-19-49.
Misdemeanor; breach of marketing contract of cooperative association; spreading false reports about the finances or management thereof.

Any person or persons or any corporation whose officers or employees knowingly induce or attempt to induce any member or stockholder of an association organized hereunder to breach his marketing contract with the association, or who knowingly spreads false reports about the finances or management thereof, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), and not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), for such offense; and shall be liable to the association aggrieved in a civil suit in the penal sum of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each such offense.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4123; 1942, § 4518; Laws, 1922, ch. 179.

Imposition of standard state assessment in addition to all court imposed fines or other penalties for any misdemeanor violation, see § 99-19-73.

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Cooperative Associations § 46.

7 Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Cooperative Associations, Forms 31-33.

§79-19-51.
Associations not in restraint of trade.

No association organized hereunder shall be deemed to be in violation of the anti-trust statutes of this state or a combination in restraint of trade or an illegal monopoly, nor in an attempt to lessen competition or fix prices arbitrarily; nor shall the marketing contracts or agreements between the association and its members or any agreements authorized in this chapter be considered illegal or in restraint of trade, or in violation of said anti-trust statutes of said state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4124; 1942, § 4519; Laws, 1922, ch. 179.

Effect of antitrust laws on agricultural organizations, see § 75-21-5.

§79-19-53.
Exemptions.

Each association organized hereunder shall be exempt from the payment of ad valorem taxes on agricultural products and products of farm, grove or garden produced by its members within the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4125; 1942, § 4520; Laws, 1922, ch. 179; Laws, 1936, ch. 328; Laws, 1954, ch. 151, § 2, eff May 1, 1954.

Privilege tax exemptions, see §§ 27-15-225, 27-17-485.

Ad valorem tax exemptions, see §§ 27-31-1 et seq.

Income and excess profits tax of cooperative association and its patrons or members. 8 A.L.R.2d 925.

§79-19-55.
Filing fees.

For filing articles of association and amendments to the articles, an association organized under this chapter shall pay to the Secretary of State Fifty Dollars ($50.00).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4126; 1942, § 4521; Laws, 1922, ch. 179; Laws, 1958, ch. 346, § 2, eff July 1, 1958; Laws, 2014, ch. 507, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

The 2014 amendment inserted “and amendments to the articles” following “For filing articles of association”, substituted “under this chapter” for “hereunder Twenty Dollars ($20.00); and for filing an amendment to the articles, Ten Dollars ($10.00)”, and added “Fifty Dollars ($50.00)” to the end of the sentence.

§79-19-57.
Cooperative marketing associations may maintain replevin.

All cooperative marketing associations organized or doing business under the laws of the State of Mississippi may obtain the possession of personal property to the immediate possession of which they may be entitled, by the action of replevin, and the giving of this means of enforcement of rights shall not be in lieu, or in repeal, of any other rights or remedies now given to cooperative marketing associations under the laws of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4127; 1942, § 4522; Laws, 1924, ch. 275.

Action of replevin, see §§ 11-37-101 et seq.

Replevin does not lie in favor of cotenant; cooperative marketing law held not to change this rule. Staple Cotton Co-op. Ass'n v. Hemphill, 142 Miss. 298, 107 So. 24, 1926 Miss. LEXIS 57 (Miss. 1926).

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Cooperative Associations §§ 42 et seq.

§79-19-59.
Liquidated damages may be recovered.

If such cooperative marketing association recover judgment as plaintiff in replevin and the property sued for be agricultural products and the plaintiff’s right to the possession thereof as against the defendant be by virtue of a marketing agreement with a member of such association and the defendant has bonded the property within two (2) days after its seizure in replevin, the plaintiff shall, in addition to the judgment now provided by law, recover as an element of damages, of the defendant and the sureties on his bond, for the wrongful taking and detention or the wrongful detention of the property, a sum equal to such damages as the plaintiff could have recovered of such member of the association as liquidated damages under the marketing agreement, for the breach thereof by wrongful detention or disposal of said property by the member.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4128; 1942, § 4523; Laws, 1934, ch. 275.

Validity and construction of provision for liquidated damages in contract with cooperative marketing association. 12 A.L.R.2d 130.

18 Am. Jur. 2d, Cooperative Associations § 45.

7 Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Cooperative Associations, Forms 11, 31-33.

§79-19-61.
Loan limited to 50 percent of capital and surplus.

The total liability to any association organized or doing business under the terms of this chapter by a person, company, corporation, or firm for money loaned shall not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the aggregate paid in capital and surplus of said association. The discount of bills of exchange drawn in good faith, against actual existing values of loans made on time secured by warehouse receipts or bills of lading, or actually existing values, shall not be restricted to, or considered as coming within, such limitation of fifty percent (50%).

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 4129; 1942, § 4524; Laws, 1924, ch. 186.

§79-19-63.
Stock in bank for cooperatives.

All cooperative agricultural associations of any kind or character whatsoever, heretofore or hereafter organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, are hereby authorized and empowered to purchase, or otherwise acquire, and to hold stock in the New Orleans Bank for Cooperatives and in the Central Bank for Cooperatives in accordance with the provisions of the Farm Credit Act of 1933 as heretofore amended and as it may hereafter be amended by the Congress of the United States.

All corporations, heretofore or hereafter organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, which are eligible to borrow from production credit associations are hereby authorized and empowered to purchase, or otherwise acquire, and to hold stock in production credit associations in accordance with the provisions of the Farm Credit Act of 1933 as heretofore amended and as it may hereafter be amended by the Congress of the United States.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 4525; Laws, 1934, ch. 276.

Farm Credit Act of 1933, see 12 USCS §§ 1131 et seq.

§79-19-65.
Applicability of general nonprofit corporation laws to associations organized under this chapter.

The general nonprofit corporation laws and all powers and rights under those laws apply to the associations organized under this chapter, except where such provisions are in conflict or inconsistent with the express provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2014, ch. 507, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2014.